arb-verbs-lexc.txt
{v@tafaw~ah_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تفوه^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tafAxar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تفاخر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tafay~aO_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تفيأ^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@Tafiq-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^طفق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taf~-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taga$~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغشى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taga*~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغذى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@TagA-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^طغا^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagADaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغاضى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagad~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغدى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagAfal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغافل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagAlab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغالب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagAlaT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغالط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagalogal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغلغل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagal~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تغلل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tagam~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغمد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tagan~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغنى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagar~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغرب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagar~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغرم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagaToras_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغطرس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagaT~aY_1@0}:^ss^تغطى^se^		Transitive;
{v@TagaY-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^طغى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagAyar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغاير^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagAzal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغازل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tagaz~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تغزل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tAh-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تاه^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHA$aY_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحاشى^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@taHa$oraj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحشرج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHa$~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحشم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taha*~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهذب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHab~ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحبب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taHAb~_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحاب^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAdav_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحادث^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahAdaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهادى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahad~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهدم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaD~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحضر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahAfat_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهافت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaf~az_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحفز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaj~ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحجب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tahaj~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهجد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaj~aja_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحجج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahaj~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهجم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaj~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAj~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحاج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAkam_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحاكم^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@tahak~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهكم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaloHal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحلحل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahal~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهلل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHal~al_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحلل^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAmal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحامل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taHAmaq_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحامق^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tahAmas_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهامس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHam~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحمس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@TaHan-a_1@0}:^ss^طحن^se^		Transitive;
{v@taHArab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحارب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taHar~a$_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحرش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHar~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحرف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taHar~aj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحرج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHar~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحرى^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHar~az_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحرز^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAsab_1@0}:^ss^تحاسب^se^		Transitive;
{v@taHAsad_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحاسد^se^@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHas~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحسب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaS~al_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحصل^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHas~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحسر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHas~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحسس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tahAtaf_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهاتف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tahat~ak_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهتك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHAwar_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تحاور^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@tahAwaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهاوى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahaw~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهود^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaw~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tahaw~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تهور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaw~aT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحوط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tahaw~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تهوى^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@taHay~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تحيل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@taHay~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحين^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHay~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحير^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaz~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحزب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@taHaz~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تحزم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tAh_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تاه^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Tah~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^طهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tajA*ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تجاذب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tajab~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tajAdal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجادل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajaE~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجعد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajah~am_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تجهم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@tajah~az_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تجهز^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@tajal~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجلد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajal~aT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجلط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajal~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجلى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajam~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجمد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajam~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجمل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajAnas_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجانس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajan~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجند^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajan~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجنن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajan~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجنس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajan~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجنى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajarojar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجرجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tAjar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تاجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajar~aO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجرأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajar~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجرد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajar~aE_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تجرع^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@tajAsar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجاسر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajas~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجسم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajAwar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجاور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajawohar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تجوهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tajaw~az_1@0}:^ss^تجوز^se^		Transitive;
{v@takA$af_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تكاشف^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@taka$~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكشف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAbar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكابر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takab~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takad~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكدر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takad~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكدس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAfaO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكافأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAfal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكافل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takaf~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكفل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takahorab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكهرب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takaH~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكحل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAlab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكالب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takal~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكلف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takal~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكلل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takal~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكلس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takan~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكنى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takar~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكرم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAsal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكاسل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takas~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تكسب^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@takas~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكسر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takAtaf_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تكاتف^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@takAvar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكاثر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takaw~am_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تكوم^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@takaw~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكور^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@takay~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تكيس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talA$aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاشى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@tala*~a*_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلذذ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaOolaO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلألأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talab~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلبد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talab~ak_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تلبك^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@talab~as_1@0}:^ss^تلبس^se^		Transitive;
{v@talaEovam_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلعثم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@TAlaE_1@0}:^ss^طالع^se^		Transitive;
{v@talAfaY_1@0}:^ss^تلافى^se^		Transitive;
{v@talafolaf_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلفلف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaf~at_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلفت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaf~aZ_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلفظ^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talAHam_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاحم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talAHaq_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاحق^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talah~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلهف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talah~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلهى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talajolaj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلجلج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talak~aO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلكأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talAmas_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تلامس^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@talam~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلمس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talam~aZ_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلمظ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Talaq-u_1@0}:^ss^طلق^se^		Transitive;
{v@talAqaH_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاقح^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talAqaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاقى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaq~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلقب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaq~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلقف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talaq~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلقن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talaq~aT_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^تلقط^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@talAsan_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاسن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talASaq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاصق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talaS~aS_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلصص^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talATam_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاطم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talaT~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلطف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaT~ax_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلطخ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talav~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلثم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talAwam_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلاوم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@talaw~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلون^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaw~av_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلوث^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaw~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلوى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@TalaY-i_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^طلى^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@talay~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تليف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@talaZ~aY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^تلظى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
